Utah statutes.
76-9-202.   Emergency reporting -- Interference -- False report.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Emergency" means a situation in which property or human life is in
jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential to the preservation of
human life or property.
(b)  "Party line" means a subscriber's line or telephone circuit consisting of
two or more main telephone stations connected therewith, each station with a
distinctive ring or telephone number.
(2) A person is guilty of emergency reporting abuse if he:
(a)  intentionally refuses to yield or surrender the use of a party line or a
public pay telephone to another person upon being informed that the telephone
is needed to report a fire or summon police, medical, or other aid in case of
emergency, unless the telephone is likewise being used for an emergency call;
(b)  asks for or requests the use of a party line or a public pay telephone on
the pretext that an emergency exists, knowing that no emergency exists; or
(c)  reports an emergency or causes an emergency to be reported to any public,
private, or volunteer entity whose purpose is to respond to fire, police, or
medical emergencies, when the actor knows the reported emergency does not
exist.
(3) (a)  A violation of Subsection (2)(a) or (b) is a class C misdemeanor.
(b)  A violation of Subsection (2)(c) is a class B misdemeanor, except as
provided under Subsection (3)(c).
(c) A violation of Subsection (2)(c) is a second degree felony if the report
is regarding a weapon of mass destruction, as defined in Section 76-10-401.
(4) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, a court shall order
any person convicted of a violation of this section to reimburse any federal,
state, or local unit of government, or any private business, organization,
individual, or entity for all expenses and losses incurred in responding to
the violation, unless the court states on the record the reasons why the
reimbursement would be inappropriate.
